Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions

Administrative rules and regulations.

Organization, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Administration, Subject 40-1-1.

2-1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this title, the term:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture.

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture of this state.

“Sustainable agriculture” or “sustainable agricultural practices” means science-based agricultural practices, technologies, or biological systems supported by research or otherwise demonstrated to lead to broad outcomes-based improvements, which may include but not be limited to such critical outcomes as increasing agricultural productivity and improving human health through access to safe, nutritious, affordable food and other agricultural products, while enhancing agricultural and surrounding environmental conditions through the stewardship of water, soil, air quality, biodiversity, and wildlife habitat, so as to meet the needs of the present and improve the ability for future generations to meet their own needs while advancing progress toward environmental, social, and economic goals and the well-being of agricultural producers and rural communities.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-1-1

; Ga. L. 2011, p. 248, § 1/HB 225.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was created as part of the Code revision and was thus enacted by Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8 (Code enactment Act).

2-1-1.1.
Policy of state to promote sustainable agriculture.

It shall be the policy of this state to promote sustainable agriculture.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-1-1.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 248, § 2/HB 225.

2-1-2.
Verification of certain licenses by inspectors.

The inspectors of the department, in the regular course of their duties, shall verify that each facility they inspect has proper state licenses for the sale of cigarettes, malt beverages, and wine. Should any facility not have such state licenses as required by law, the state revenue commissioner shall be notified of such fact immediately, so that he can take such action as is required by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 506.

2-1-3.
Sales of farm products, plants, and seed on Sunday.

It shall be lawful to sell or offer for sale perishable farm products, growing plants, and perishable seed on Sunday.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 202, § 1.

2-1-4.
Anti-siphon devices for irrigation systems; rules and regulations as to such devices; hearings on violations; administrative and judicial review; filing of final order; payment of penalty.

Any irrigation system which is designed or used for the application of fertilizer, pesticide, or chemicals must be equipped with an anti-siphon device adequate to protect against contamination of the water supply. Such anti-siphon device shall consist of a check valve and low pressure drain in the irrigation supply line located between the irrigation pump and the point of injection of fertilizer, pesticide, or chemicals. Any system which complied with the law in effect on January 1, 1982, shall be deemed to be in compliance with the provisions of this subsection.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use any irrigation system designed or used for the application of fertilizer, pesticide, or chemicals, which system is not equipped as required by this Code section.

The Commissioner shall make and publish in print or electronically such rules and regulations as he deems necessary to carry out this Code section, which rules and regulations are not inconsistent with this Code section. Such rules and regulations may specify requirements to be met by anti-siphon devices and the placement of such devices to provide adequate protection.

The Commissioner, in order to enforce this Code section or any orders, rules, and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, may issue an administrative order imposing a penalty not to exceed $1,000.00 for each violation whenever the Commissioner, after a hearing, determines that any person has violated any provision of this Code section, or any regulation or order promulgated hereunder. The hearing and any administrative review thereof shall be conducted in accordance with the procedure for contested cases under Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” Any person who has exhausted all administrative remedies available and who is aggrieved or adversely affected by a final order or action of the Commissioner shall have the right of judicial review thereof in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50. All penalties recovered under this Code section shall be paid into the state treasury. The Commissioner may file in the superior court wherein the person under order resides, or, if the person is a corporation, in the county wherein the corporation maintains its principal place of business, or in the county wherein the violation occurred, a certified copy of a final order of the Commissioner unappealed from, or of a final order of the Commissioner affirmed upon appeal, whereupon such court shall render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties. Such judgment shall have the same effect, and proceedings in relation thereto shall thereafter be the same, as though such judgment has been rendered in a suit duly heard and determined by such court. The penalty prescribed in this Code section shall be concurrent, alternative, and cumulative with any and all other civil, criminal, or alternative rights, remedies, forfeitures, or penalties provided, allowed, or available to the Commissioner with respect to any violation of this Code section or any orders, rules, or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1256, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1232, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

Cross references.

Control of water pollution and surface-water use, §

12-5-20

et seq.

Wells and drinking water, §

12-5-70

et seq.

2-1-5.
Annual license fee for grain dealers, commercial feed dealers, grain warehousemen, and qualified agricultural producers; retention of funds.

An individual conducting business as a grain dealer, commercial feed dealer, and grain warehouseman shall pay an annual license fee in an amount not less than $1,500.00 nor more than $3,000.00. Any fees collected pursuant to this Code section shall be retained pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 45-12-92.1.

A qualified agricultural producer, as defined in Code Section 48-8-3.3, shall pay an annual license fee in an amount not less than $15.00 nor more than $25.00, but in no event shall the total amount of the proceeds from such fees exceed the cost of administering Code Section 48-8-3.3.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-1-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2553, § 2.5; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1070, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-1/HB 1055; Ga. L. 2012, p. 257, § 5-7/HB 386; Ga. L. 2014, p. 288, § 2/HB 983.

Cross references.

License required, §

2-9-31

.

Issuance, renewal, and expiration of license, §

2-9-33

.

License required for distribution; product registration; fees;
refusal or cancellation of license or registration, §

2-13-6

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 257, § 7-1(h)/HB 386, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Tax, penalty, and interest liabilities and refund eligibility for prior taxable years shall not be affected by the passage of this Act and shall continue to be governed by the provisions of
general law as it existed immediately prior to the effective date of the relevant portion of this Act.” The amendment to this Code section became effective January 1, 2013.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 257, § 7-1(i)/HB 386, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall not abate any prosecution, punishment, penalty, administrative proceedings or remedies, or civil action related to any violation of law committed prior to the effective date of the relevant portion of this Act.” The amendment to this Code section became effective January 1, 2013.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 257, § 7-2/HB 386, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 288, § 3/HB 983, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2015, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015.”

Law reviews.

For article, “Revenue and Taxation:
Amend Titles 48, 2, 28, 33, 36, 46, and 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, Relating Respectively to Revenue and Taxation, Agriculture, the General Assembly, Insurance, Local Government, Public Utilities, and State Government,” see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 217 (2011).

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 112 (2012).

2-1-6.
Preemption of local ordinances relating to production of agricultural or farm products.

No county, municipality, consolidated government, or other political subdivision of this state shall adopt or enforce any ordinance, rule, regulation, or resolution regulating crop management or animal husbandry practices involved in the production of agricultural or farm products on any private property.

Subsection (a) of this Code section shall not prohibit or impair the power of any local government to adopt or enforce any zoning ordinance or make any other zoning decision. As used in this subsection, the terms “local government”, “zoning decision”, and “zoning ordinance” have the same meanings provided by Code Section 36-66-3.

Subsection (a) of this Code section shall not prohibit or impair any existing power of a county, municipality, consolidated government, or other political subdivision of this state to adopt or enforce any ordinance, rule, regulation, or resolution regulating land application of human waste.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-1-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 444, § 1/HB 529.